Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1659XS (3) 91 lh/ko S.F. 218 Section 1. MODERNIZATION OF NUTRITION PROGRAMS ââ 1 INITIATIVES ââ REPORT. 2 1. For the purposes of this section: 3 a. âDepartmentâ means the department of health and human 4 services. 5 b. âSNAPâ means the same as defined in section 239.1. 6 c. âWICâ means the special supplemental nutrition program 7 for women, infants, and children as provided in 42 U.S.C. Â§1786 8 et seq. 9 2. The department shall do all of the following to modernize 10 nutrition programs in the state: 11 a. Create an integrated eligibility determination 12 application to be used for both WIC and SNAP. 13 b. Incorporate all available federal waivers to modernize 14 WIC by building or enhancing remote service, including through 15 a waiver permitting the use of telephone and video calls, 16 rather than requiring physical presence to complete WIC 17 certification and recertification. 18 c. Implement a pilot initiative that creates opportunities 19 and modifies the departmentâs internet site for WIC to simplify 20 the application process and WIC benefit distribution by doing 21 all of the following: 22 (1) Implement streamlined eligibility for WIC applicants 23 who demonstrate proof of enrollment in SNAP or Medicaid by 24 using state-level referrals and data and information sharing 25 and matching. 26 (2) Enable automatic online loading of benefits to WIC 27 nutrition cards. 28 (3) Offer online shopping with WIC nutrition cards. 29 (4) Explore other opportunities to improve access to WIC 30 benefits and to remove administrative burdens as allowed by 31 federal law. 32 3. The department shall request federal approval of 33 any waiver or state plan as necessary to implement the 34 modernization initiatives described in subsection 2 and shall 35 -1- LSB 1659XS (3) 91 lh/ko 1/ 3 S.F. 218 implement the initiatives upon receipt of federal approval. 1 4. Within thirty days following completion of the first six 2 months of the implementation of this section, the department 3 shall submit a report to the general assembly regarding 4 the outcomes resulting from this section, an evaluation of 5 the feasibility of expanding the modernization initiatives 6 statewide, and the projected impact of statewide expansion. 7